test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nouns_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - risi: # k_1
        risi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: : risi
        risi+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: : risa
        risi+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: : risa
        risi+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: : risa
        risi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: : risin
        risi+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: : risan
        risi+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: : risanum
        risi+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: : risans
        risi+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: : risar
        risi+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: : risar
        risi+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: : risum
        risi+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: : risa
        risi+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: : risarnir
        risi+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: : risarnar
        risi+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: : risunum
        risi+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: : risanna
    
  Noun - bátur: # k_6
        bátur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: : bátur
        bátur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: : bát
        bátur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: : báti
        bátur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: : báts
        bátur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: : báturin
        bátur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: : bátin
        bátur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: : bátinum
        bátur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: : bátsins
        bátur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: : bátar
        bátur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: : bátar
        bátur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: : bátum
        bátur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: : báta
        bátur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: : bátarnir
        bátur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: : bátarnar
        bátur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: : bátunum
        bátur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: : bátanna
    
